Utah statutes.
62A-3-311.5.   Notice of supported finding -- Procedure for challenging finding -- Limitations.

(1) (a)  Except as provided in Subsection (1)(b), within 15 days after the day on which the division makes a supported finding that a person committed abuse, neglect, or exploitation of a vulnerable adult, the division shall serve the person with a notice of agency action, in accordance with Subsections (2) and (3).

(b)  The division may serve the notice described in Subsection (1)(a) within a reasonable time after the 15 day period described in Subsection (1)(a) if:

(i)  the delay is necessary in order to:

(A)  avoid impeding an ongoing criminal investigation or proceeding; or

(B)  protect the safety of a person; and

(ii)  the notice is provided before the supported finding is used as a basis to deny the person a license or otherwise adversely impact the person.

(2)  The division shall cause the notice described in Subsection (1)(a) to be served by personal service or certified mail.

(3)  The notice described in Subsection (1)(a) shall:

(a)  indicate that the division has conducted an investigation regarding alleged abuse, neglect, or exploitation of a vulnerable adult by the alleged perpetrator;

(b)  indicate that, as a result of the investigation described in Subsection (3)(a), the division made a supported finding that the alleged perpetrator committed abuse, neglect, or exploitation of a vulnerable adult;

(c)  include a summary of the facts that are the basis for the supported finding;

(d)  indicate that the supported finding may result in disqualifying the person from:

(i)  being licensed, certified, approved, or employed by a government agency;

(ii)  being employed by a service provider, person, or other entity that contracts with, or is licensed by, a government agency; or

(iii)  qualifying as a volunteer for an entity described in Subsection (3)(d)(i) or (ii);

(e)  indicate that, as a result of the supported finding, the alleged perpetrator's identifying information is listed in the database;

(f)  indicate that the alleged perpetrator may request a copy of the report of the alleged abuse, neglect, or exploitation; and

(g)  inform the alleged perpetrator of:

(i)  the right described in Subsection (4)(a); and

(ii)  the consequences of failing to exercise the right described in Subsection (4)(a) in a timely manner.

(4) (a)  The alleged perpetrator has the right, within 30 days after the day on which the notice described in Subsection (1)(a) is served, to challenge the supported finding by filing a request for an informal adjudicative proceeding, under Title 63G, Chapter 4, Administrative Procedures Act.

(b)  If the alleged perpetrator fails to file a request for an informal adjudicative proceeding within the time described in Subsection (4)(a), the supported finding will become final and will not be subject to challenge or appeal.

(5)  At the hearing described in Subsection (4)(a), the division has the burden of proving, by a preponderance of the evidence, that the alleged perpetrator committed abuse, neglect, or exploitation of a vulnerable adult.

(6)  Notwithstanding any provision of this section, an alleged perpetrator described in this section may not challenge a supported finding if a court of competent jurisdiction entered a finding in a proceeding to which the alleged perpetrator was a party, that the alleged perpetrator committed the abuse, neglect, or exploitation of a vulnerable adult, upon which the supported finding is based.

(7)  A person who was listed in the database as a perpetrator before May 5, 2008, and who did not have an opportunity to challenge the division's finding that resulted in the listing, may at any time:

(a)  request that the division reconsider the division's finding; or

(b)  request an informal adjudicative proceeding, under Title 63G, Chapter 4, Administrative Procedures Act, to challenge the finding.

